Illinois, session 104th, HB1787.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The School Safety Drill Act is amended by 5adding Section 22 as follows: 6    (105 ILCS 128/22 new)7    Sec. 22. Substitute personnel training and support.8    (a) A school district shall provide training on school 9evacuation drills and law enforcement lockdown drills to all 10school personnel serving in a substitute capacity. Training 11shall be provided in person when available. With respect to 12individuals who hold a Short-Term Substitute Teaching License 13under Section 21B-20 of the School Code, this training may be 14included as part of the training provided under Section 1510-20.67 of the School Code.16    (b) In addition to the training under subsection (a), a 17school district shall provide support for substitute personnel 18by ensuring that recommendations are implemented, including, 19without limitation, that:20        (1) maps indicating all school exits are prominently 21    displayed in every classroom; and22        (2) the information packet given to 23    full-time-equivalent employees includes district-approved   HB1787 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 10766 LNS 20846 b1    materials outlining evacuation and lockdown procedures.